Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202621-1701
Act, how cited.

Sections 21-1701 to 21-17,115 shall be known and may be cited as the Credit Union Act.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 23;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 15;

Laws 2017, LB375, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 61.